Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4456.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325M.22] DATA BROKER REGISTRY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) The definitions in section 325M.11 apply to this section and the terms defined in this subdivision have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Data broker" means a person who knowingly sells to a third party the personal data of a consumer with whom the person does not have a direct relationship. Data broker includes a person who has a direct relationship with a consumer but also sells personal information about the consumer that the person did not directly collect from the consumer. new text end new text begin (c) "Direct relationship" means a consumer intentionally interacts with a person to obtain information about, access, purchase, use, or request the person's products or services within the preceding three years. Direct relationship does not include a situation where the purpose of a person's engagement with a person is (1) to exercise a right described under section 325M.14, or (2) for the person to verify the consumer's identity. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Exclusions. new text end new text begin This section does not apply to a person or entity that is subject to an exclusion under section 325M.12, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Registration required. new text end new text begin (a) A data broker is prohibited from collecting or selling a consumer's personal data unless the data broker has a current registration approved by the attorney general. new text end new text begin (b) To register with the attorney general, a data broker must: new text end new text begin (1) pay the registration fee established by the attorney general under subdivision 5; and new text end new text begin (2) submit the following information in the form and manner specified by the attorney general: new text end new text begin (i) the data broker's name; new text end new text begin (ii) the data broker's street address and telephone number; new text end new text begin (iii) the data broker's primary website and electronic mail address; new text end new text begin (iv) a valid and operating link to the data broker's website that details how consumers may exercise the rights under section 325M.14 with respect to the data broker; and new text end new text begin (v) other information the attorney general considers relevant for registration. new text end new text begin (c) A data broker who is also a controller or a processor under sections 325M.10 to 325M.21 must comply with sections 325M.10 to 325M.21 in order to be registered under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Administration; public website. new text end new text begin (a) If a data broker complies with the registration requirements in subdivision 3, the attorney general must approve the registration. A registration under this section is valid until December 31 of the year in which the attorney general approves the registration. new text end new text begin (b) The attorney general must make the information submitted by all registered data brokers under subdivision 3 available to the public on a website maintained by the attorney general. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Fees; special revenue fund account created. new text end new text begin (a) The attorney general must establish a fee for data broker registration under this section in an amount sufficient to pay the costs incurred to administer and enforce this section. The determination of the fee amount under this paragraph is not subject to chapter 14, including section 14.386. new text end new text begin (b) A data broker registry account is established in the special revenue fund. All fees recovered by the attorney general must be deposited in the data broker registry account. Money in the data broker registry account is appropriated to the attorney general to pay the costs incurred to administer and enforce this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin The attorney general may bring a civil action against a data broker who violates this section under section 325M.20. The procedures, penalties, and limitations in section 325M.20 apply to an action by the attorney general against a data broker under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 31, 2027. new text end